Illinois, session 104th, HB4494.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-6 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-6)  (from Ch. 23, par. 5-6)7    Sec. 5-6. Obligations incurred prior to death of a 8recipient. Obligations incurred but not paid for at the the 9time of a recipient's death for services authorized under 10Section 5-5, including medical and other care in facilities as 11defined in the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental 12Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care 13Act, or the MC/DD Act, or in like facilities not required to be 14licensed under that Act, may be paid, subject to the rules and 15regulations of the Illinois Department, after the death of the 16recipient.17(Source: P.A. 98-104, eff. 7-22-13; 99-180, eff. 7-29-15.)